Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2878.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.14, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Lottery. (a) If the number of qualified applicants who are verified social equity applicants seeking a type of license exceeds the number of licenses of that type that are made available for social equity applicants, the office must first conduct a lottery consisting of verified social equity applicants to select qualified applicants for preliminary license approval. If a social equity applicant is not selected in a lottery conducted under this paragraph, the office must include the social equity applicant in the pool of applicants for licenses of that type that are made available to all applicants.new text begin In each licensing period, the office must review all verified social equity applicants before reviewing general licensing applicants.new text end (b) If the number of qualified applicants seeking a type of license exceeds the number of licenses of that type that are made available to all applicants, the office must conduct a lottery to select applicants for preliminary license approval. (c) A lottery conducted under this section must be impartial, random, and in a format determined by the office. (d) Following the completion of any lottery conducted pursuant to paragraphs (a) or (b), the office must notify each applicant entered in the lottery that the applicant was either selected or not selected in the lottery.